Vermont, session 2025-2026, H150.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4019a is amended to read:
§ 4019a. FIREARMS TRANSFERS; WAITING PERIOD
(a) A person shall not transfer a firearm to another person until 72 hours
after the licensed dealer facilitating the transfer is provided with a unique
identification number for the transfer by the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS) or seven business days have elapsed since
the dealer contacted NICS to initiate the background check, whichever occurs
first.
(b) A person who transfers a firearm to another person in violation of
subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or
fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(c) This section shall not apply to a firearm transfer that does not require a
background check under 18 U.S.C. § 922(t) or section 4019 of this title.
(d) As used in this section, “firearm” has the same meaning as in
subsection 4017(d) of this title.
(e) [Repealed.]
(f) This section shall not apply to the return of a firearm, frame, or receiver
to a person by a licensed dealer after the dealer has serialized it pursuant to
federal law or section 4084 of this title if the dealer returns the firearm, frame,
or receiver to the same person from whom it was received.
VT LEG #379589 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.150
2025 Page 3 of 3
(g)(1) This section shall not apply to a firearms transfer at a gun show.
(2) As used in this subsection, “gun show” means a function sponsored
by:
(A) a national, state, or local organization, devoted to the collection,
competitive use, or other sporting use of firearms; or
(B) an organization or association that sponsors functions devoted to
the collection, competitive use, or other sporting use of firearms in the
community.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379589 v.1